Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-139
Hearing before county board or hearing examiner; when allowed.

Any person whose claim for general assistance or medical services (1) has not been acted upon within the time established by section 68-133, (2) has been denied, (3) has not been granted in full, (4) has been reduced or terminated, or (5) has been suspended for failure to participate in a program established pursuant to section 68-152 may request a hearing on such action or inaction before the county board or, if the county board so delegates as allowed by section 68-133, before an employee of the county.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 9;

Laws 1984, LB 886, § 5;

Laws 1990, LB 422, § 7.